District of Columbia statutes.
1-307.66

Eligibility to open an opportunity account; account limit.

(a)

An individual whose household income does not exceed 85% of the District of Columbia median income may open an opportunity account.

(b)

The total balance in an opportunity account, except interested earned on matching funds or funds deposited into the account by the account holder, shall not exceed $10,000.

Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-266, § 7, 48 DCR 1240